Nebraska, session 109, LB155.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB155 LB155
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 28-1406, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-1406 As used in sections 28-1406 to 28-1416, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) Actor means any person who uses force in such a manner as to
attempt to invoke the privileges and immunities afforded to the actor by
sections 28-1406 to 28-1416, except any duly authorized law enforcement
officer of the State of Nebraska or its political subdivisions; Unlawful
force shall mean force, including confinement, which is employed without
the consent of the person against whom it is directed and the employment
of which constitutes an offense or actionable tort or would constitute
such offense or tort except for a defense such as the absence of intent,
negligence, or mental capacity; duress; youth; or diplomatic status; not
amounting to a privilege to use the force;
(2) Assent means shall mean consent, whether or not it otherwise is
legally effective, except assent to the infliction of death or serious
bodily harm;
(3) Deadly force means shall mean force which the actor uses with
the purpose of causing or which the actor he knows to create a
substantial risk of causing death or serious bodily harm. Purposely
firing a firearm in the direction of another person or at a vehicle in
which another person is believed to be constitutes deadly force. A threat
to cause death or serious bodily harm, by the production of a weapon or
otherwise, so long as the actor's purpose is limited to creating an
apprehension that the actor he will use deadly force if necessary, shall
not constitute deadly force;
(4) Actor shall mean any person who uses force in such a manner as
to attempt to invoke the privileges and immunities afforded him by
sections 28-1406 to 28-1416, except any duly authorized law enforcement
officer of the State of Nebraska or its political subdivisions;
(4) (5) Dwelling means shall mean any building or structure, though
-2-

LB155 LB155
2025 2025
movable or temporary, or a portion thereof, which is for the time being
the actor's home or place of lodging; and
(5) Motor vehicle has the same meaning as in section 28-109;
(6) Public officer means shall mean any elected or appointed officer
or employee of the State of Nebraska or its political subdivisions,
except any duly authorized law enforcement officer of the State of
Nebraska or its political subdivisions; and .
(7) Unlawful force means force, including confinement, which is
employed without the consent of the person against whom it is directed
and the employment of which constitutes an offense or actionable tort or
would constitute such offense or tort except for a defense such as the
absence of intent, negligence, or mental capacity; duress; youth; or
diplomatic status; not amounting to a privilege to use the force.
Sec. 2. Section 28-1409, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-1409 (1) Subject to the provisions of this section and of section
28-1414, the use of force upon or toward another person is justifiable
when the actor believes that such force is immediately necessary for the
purpose of protecting the actor himself against the use of unlawful force
by such other person on the present occasion.
(2) The use of such force is not justifiable under this section to
resist an arrest which the actor knows is being made by a peace officer,
although the arrest is unlawful.
(3) The use of such force is not justifiable under this section to
resist force used by the occupier or possessor of property or by another
person on his behalf of the occupier or possessor, when where the actor
knows that the person using the force is doing so under a claim of right
to protect the property, except that this limitation shall not apply if:
(a) The actor is a public officer acting in the performance of the
actor's his duties or a person lawfully assisting the actor him therein
or a person making or assisting in a lawful arrest;
-3-

LB155 LB155
2025 2025
(b) The actor has been unlawfully dispossessed of the property and
is making a reentry or recapture justified by section 28-1411; or
(c) The actor believes that such force is necessary to protect the
actor himself against death or serious bodily harm.
(4) The use of deadly force shall not be justifiable under this
section unless the actor believes that such force is necessary to protect
the actor himself against death, serious bodily harm, kidnapping or
sexual intercourse compelled by force or threat, nor is it justifiable
if:
(a) The actor, with the purpose of causing death or serious bodily
harm, provoked the use of force against the actor himself in the same
encounter; or
(b) The actor knows that the actor he can avoid the necessity of
using such force with complete safety by retreating or by surrendering
possession of a thing to a person asserting a claim of right thereto or
by complying with a demand that the actor he abstain from any action
which the actor he has no duty to take, except that:
(i) The actor is shall not be obliged to retreat from the actor's
his dwelling or place of work, unless the actor he was the initial
aggressor or is assailed in the actor's his place of work by another
person whose place of work the actor knows it to be; and
(ii) The actor is not obliged to retreat from a motor vehicle in
which the actor is lawfully present, unless the actor was the initial
aggressor; and
(iii) (ii) A public officer justified in using force in the
performance of the officer's his duties, or a person justified in using
force in assisting the officer, his assistance or a person justified in
using force in making an arrest or preventing an escape shall not be
obliged to desist from efforts to perform such duty, effect such arrest,
or prevent such escape because of resistance or threatened resistance by
or on behalf of the person against whom such action is directed.
-4-

LB155 LB155
2025 2025
(5) Except as required by subsections (3) and (4) of this section, a
person employing protective force may estimate the necessity thereof
under the circumstances as such person he believes them to be when the
force is used, without retreating, surrendering possession, doing any
other act which such person he has no legal duty to do, or abstaining
from any lawful action.
(6) The justification afforded by this section extends to the use of
confinement as protective force only if the actor takes all reasonable
measures to terminate the confinement as soon as the actor he knows that
the actor he safely can do so, unless the person confined has been
arrested on a charge of crime.
Sec. 3. Section 28-1410, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-1410 (1) Subject to the provisions of this section and of section
28-1414, the use of force upon or toward the person of another is
justifiable to protect a third person when:
(a) The actor would be justified under section 28-1409 in using such
force to protect the actor himself against the injury the actor he
believes to be threatened to the person whom the actor he seeks to
protect;
(b) Under the circumstances as the actor believes them to be, the
person whom the actor he seeks to protect would be justified in using
such protective force; and
(c) The actor believes that his intervention by the actor is
necessary for the protection of such other person.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section:
(a) When the actor would be obliged under section 28-1409 to
retreat, to surrender the possession of a thing or to comply with a
demand before using force in self-protection, the actor he shall not be
obliged to do so before using force for the protection of another person,
unless the actor he knows that the actor he can thereby secure the
-5-

LB155 LB155
2025 2025
complete safety of such other person;
(b) When the person whom the actor seeks to protect would be obliged
under section 28-1409 to retreat, to surrender the possession of a thing
or to comply with a demand if such person he knew that such person he
could obtain complete safety by so doing, the actor is obliged to try to
cause such person him to do so before using force in such person's his
protection if the actor knows that such person he can obtain complete
safety in that way; and
(c) Neither the actor nor the person whom the actor he seeks to
protect is obliged to retreat when in the other's dwelling or place of
work to any greater extent than in his or her own; and .
(d) Neither the actor nor the person whom the actor seeks to protect
is obliged to retreat when lawfully present in the other's motor vehicle
to any greater extent than his or her own.
Sec. 4. Original sections 28-1406, 28-1409, and 28-1410, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-6-